Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 9 School Funds and Property

16-9-1.
Receipt and payment of school funds by town treasurer.

The town treasurer shall receive the money due the town from the state for public schools, and shall keep a separate accounting of all money appropriated by the state or town or otherwise for public schools in the town, and shall pay the money to the order of the school committee; provided, however, that school expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals shall not, in any fiscal year, exceed the total revenue appropriated for public schools in the town. Should the town treasurer, finance director, or other charter officer charged with general responsibility for town finances, or the school financial officer, estimate that actual public school expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals may exceed the total revenue appropriated for the expenditures in any fiscal year, the school committee, the superintendent of schools, and the chief elected officials of the town shall be notified. Purchase orders or financial commitments shall not be authorized even on the order of the school committee unless it can be proven that there will not be an excess of expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals over revenues. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school committee from negotiating and contracting with school employees and teachers for services to be rendered in the ensuing fiscal years pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 5; impl. am. Const. Amend., art. 27; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 4; P.L. 1981, ch. 397, § 2.

16-9-2.
Annual statement — Contents.

The town treasurer shall, before the tenth (10th) day of July in each year, submit to the school committee a statement of all money applicable to the support of public schools for the current school year, specifying the sources of the money.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 12; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-2

.

16-9-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 13; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-3

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 152, § 1, effective June 23, 1987.

16-9-4.
Town providing for schoolhouses.

Any town may vote, in a meeting notified for that purpose, to provide schoolhouses, together with the necessary fixtures and appendages.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 54, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 69, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 179, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-4

.

16-9-4.1.
New school construction — Regulations for technology requirements.

The department of elementary and secondary education is instructed to develop regulations to ensure that any city, town, or district which undertakes “new school construction” as defined in this section provides in the planning for necessary wiring which is consistent with current standards for computer networking technology in schools.

The sponsor of any new school construction project or any school project involving the leasing of any portion of an existing building for use as a school shall also comply with the requirements for schools set forth in §

23-19.14-4

.

For the purposes of this section, “new school construction” means:

Any new school buildings.

Additions of any new classrooms to existing school buildings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 163, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 179, § 2.

16-9-5.
Power of city or town to condemn for school purposes — Maximum acreage.

Any city or town from time to time may take lands within the city or town, improved or unimproved, for the location of schoolhouses, the enlargement of schoolhouse lots, and for school purposes, provided that the amount of the land at any one taking shall not exceed fifteen (15) acres; except that:

The town of Foster may at any one taking take lands for these purposes in an amount not exceeding ten (10) acres;

The city of Warwick may at any one taking take lands for these purposes in an amount not exceeding fifteen (15) acres, provided, however, that before the city of Warwick may take more than five (5) acres for this purpose, it shall hold a public hearing;

The town of Narragansett may at any one taking take lands for these purposes in an amount not exceeding twelve (12) acres, provided, however, that before the town of Narragansett may take more than five (5) acres for this purpose, it shall hold a public hearing;

The town of Jamestown may at any one taking take lands for these purposes in an amount not exceeding twenty-five (25) acres;

The city of Cranston may at one taking take lands for these purposes in an amount not exceeding twenty-five (25) acres.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 75, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 82, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2312, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 356, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 35.

16-9-6.
Filing of description of land taken — Notice to owners — Payment of agreed price.

If any town has already passed or shall pass a vote to erect a schoolhouse or to enlarge a schoolhouse lot, and the school committee shall fix upon a location for the schoolhouse in the town or shall determine that a school lot ought to be enlarged, the school committee of the town shall, within six (6) months from the date of the passage of a resolution by the school committee to take any land for these purposes, file in the records of land evidence for the town a description of the land, and also a plat of the land, and a statement that the land is taken pursuant to the provisions of §§

16-9-5

to

16-9-8

, which description and statement shall be signed by the chairperson or president of the school committee, and upon the filing of the description, statement, and plat, the title in fee simple of the land shall vest in the town. After the filing of the description, statement, and plat, notice of the taking of the land shall be served upon the owners of and persons having an estate in and interested in the land by the town sergeant of the town leaving a true and attested copy of the description and statement with each of the persons personally, or at their last and usual place of abode in this state with some person living there, and, in case any persons are absent from this state and have no last and usual place of abode in this state occupied by any person, or in case the whereabouts of any persons are unknown to the town sergeant, the copy shall be left with the persons, if any, in charge of or having possession of the land taken of the absent person and persons whose whereabouts are unknown, and another copy of the description and statement shall be mailed to the address of the absent persons if they are known to the officer. After the filing of the description and statement, the town clerk of the town shall cause a copy of the description and statement to be published in some newspaper published in the county in which the town is located at least twice a week for three (3) successive weeks. If any party shall agree with the school committee for the price of the land so taken, the agreed price shall immediately be paid to that party by the town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1306, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 75, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 82, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 343, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-6

.

16-9-7.
Assessment of land value by jury — Petition of owner.

Any owner of or person entitled to any estate in or interested in any part of the land so taken, who cannot agree with the school committee for the price of the land so taken in which he or she is interested, may, within three (3) months after personal notice of the taking, or, if he or she have no personal notice, may, within one year from the filing of the description, statement, and plat referred to in §

16-9-6

, apply by petition to the superior court held for the county where the land is located, setting forth the taking of his or her land and praying for an assessment of damages by a jury. Upon the filing of the petition the court shall cause twenty (20) days’ notice of the pendency of the petition to be given to the town by serving the town treasurer of the town with a certified copy of the petition, and may proceed after the notice to the trial; and the trial shall determine all questions of fact relating to the value of the land and the amount; and shall be conducted in every respect as other civil cases are tried, including the right to except to rulings and apply for new trial for cause. In case of conflicting claims to the land by any two (2) or more petitioners, the court may set down the petitions of the petitioners for trial at the same time by the same jury, and may frame all necessary issues for the trial.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1306, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 75, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 82, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 343, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-7

.

16-9-8.
Late filing of petition by landowner not receiving personal notice.

In case any owner of or person having an estate in or interested in the land shall fail to receive personal notice of the taking of the land, and shall fail to file his or her petition as provided in §

16-9-7

, the court in its discretion may permit the filing of the petition subsequent to the period of one year from the filing of the description and statement; provided, the person shall have had no actual knowledge of the taking of the land in season to file the petition; and provided, the town, after the filing of the description and statement, shall not have paid any other persons claiming to own the land the price or value of the land, or be liable to pay for the land under any judgment rendered against the town under the provisions of §§

16-9-5

to

16-9-8

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 1306, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 75, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 82, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 343, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-8

.

16-9-9.
Purchase of flags and staffs for school buildings.

The school committees of the several towns of the state shall, in the same manner as now provided by law for the purchase of supplies for public schools by the committees, purchase for every school in their respective towns not now provided with a United States flag, flag staff, and the necessary appliances for the flag; and thereafter whenever the flag, flag staff, or the necessary appliances for the flag of any school shall from any cause become unsuitable for further use, the school committee shall in the same manner purchase others in place thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 818, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-9

.

16-9-10.
Display of flags.

The school committees of the several towns shall cause the United States flag to be displayed upon the public school buildings or premises during school hours if in their best judgment it is practicable, otherwise at any times that they may direct, and the committees shall also establish rules and regulations for the proper care, custody, and display of the flag; and when for any cause it is not displayed, it shall be placed conspicuously in the principal room of the school building.

History of Section.

P.L. 1906, ch. 818, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

16-9-10

.